Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2617
Application to court; procedure.

Except as otherwise provided, an application to the court under the Uniform Arbitration Act shall be by motion and shall be heard in the manner and upon the notice provided by law or rule of court for the making and hearing of motions. Unless the parties have agreed otherwise, notice of an initial application for an order shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in an action.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 17.